Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-558
Draining harmful matter into waters stocked by commission prohibited; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person, association, or corporation to place, run, or drain any matter harmful to fish into any of the waters of this state that have been stocked by the commission. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1937, c. 89, § 19, p. 301;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-517;

R.S.1943, § 37-520;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 195;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-520;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 278.